local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCČĆDDžĐEFGHIJKLLjMNNjOPRSŠTUVZŽabcčćddžđefghijklljmnnjoprsštuvzž</alphabet>

  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-sh-mk.symbols.xml"/>

  <!-- punctuation -->
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="i__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- preposition paradigms -->
    <pardef n="za__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="personal_pronouns__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joj</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nam</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vam</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ili"><i>ili</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="prema"><i>prema</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="za"><i>za</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pri"><i>pri</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="od"><i>od</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iz"><i>iz</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
